Maine, session 132, LD532.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 17-A MRSA §752-F, as enacted by PL 2023, c. 455, §2, is amended to read:
§752-F. Assault in an emergency room on a health care worker
1. A person is guilty of assault in an emergency room on a health care worker if that
person intentionally, knowingly or recklessly causes bodily injury to a person employed or
contracted by a hospital licensed under Title 22, chapter 405 if or a person employed or
contracted by a health care entity, as defined in Title 22, section 1718-B, subsection 1,
paragraph B, that is licensed by the State to provide health care and the injury occurs in the
hospital's designated emergency room course of the person's employment as a health care
worker.
2. Assault in an emergency room on a health care worker is a Class C crime.